Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 22 Hospital or Medical Service Insurance and Prepaid Health ServicePlans

Cross references. —

For disability insurance policies generally, see §§

26-18-101

through

26-18-136

.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2003, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, requests Congress to equalize the tax treatment of employer-provided and individually purchased health insurance by creating a tax credit for the full amount of insurance purchased by individuals since the high cost of health insurance has created a large number of uninsured citizens in the United States and the State, those without health insurance are less likely to receive adequate health care, insurance purchasing decisions are to a large extent made by employers and not insurance beneficiaries, overreliance on employer-provided health insurance impedes worker mobility, spiraling health care costs are in part caused by a lack of active consumer participation in health care markets, and employers can deduct the full cost of employee health insurance as a business expense, while individuals may not.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Priority and apportionment of liability between medical and hospital expense insurers, 25 ALR4th 1022.

Applicability of other insurance benefits exclusion, from coverage of hospital or health and accident policy, to governmental insurance benefits to which insured would have been entitled by prior subscription, 29 ALR4th 361.

Health provider's agreement as to patient's copayment liability after award by professional service insurer as unfair trade practice under state law, 49 ALR4th 1240.

What services, equipment or supplies are “medically necessary” for purposes of coverage under medical insurance, 75 ALR4th 763.